apertium-hye.hye.twol
Alphabet 
 ա  ե է ը ո օ ի լ
 և
բ գ դ զ թ ժ  խ ծ կ հ ձ ղ ճ մ յ ն շ չ պ ջ ռ ս վ տ ր ց ւ փ ք ֆ
 Ա  Ե Է Ը Ո Օ Ի Լ
Բ Գ Դ Զ Թ Ժ  Խ Ծ Կ Հ Ձ Ղ Ճ Մ Յ Ն Շ Չ Պ Ջ Ռ Ս Վ Տ Ր Ց Ւ Փ Ք Ֆ
%{յ%}:յ !stable glide that cant be deleted at end of words

՚		!apostrophe

՜:՜		!punctuation from the infixial file that's added to every word
՞:՞
՛:՛
%{՜%}   ! irregular punctuation inside lexical entries
%{՞%}
%{՛%}



!other punctuation symbols
%-
֊ 
– 
 — 
, 
՝
։
.
'
 «
»
%(
%)
՚
՟
…    
ՙ    

% 
%{ThAյ%}:0
%{լ%}:լ

%{ProhPl%}:0 %{ImpSg%}:0 %{Aor%}:0 %{Impf%}:0 %{Pres3SG%}:0 %{Pres2PL%}:0 %{NegPtcpHye%}:0
%{Pres3SGE%}:0

! no plural possessive նի in hye so commented out
! %{PossPlի%}:ի  ! The plural possessive generally surfaces with ի unless before a vowel
!
! %{SpurPlե%}:0  ! Spurious plural is deleted unless after monosyllables
! %{SpurPlր%}:0 

%{defն%}:ը    ! for definite allomorphy ն-ը; i assume easier default is ը
%{Plն%}:ն		!for plural allomorphy եր ներ; I assume easier default is polysyllabic ներ


%{Ninfl%}:0  ! Boundary between noun and inflection
%{NinflRed%}:0 ! Boundary between noun and inflection, for obligatory reduction
%{NinflRedForcedNer%}:0  ! Boundary between noun and -ner suffix, obligatory reduction in some lexemes
%{mono%}:0     ! This is boundary before a monosyllabic root to trigger the right plural
%{super%}:0  ! this boundary between superlative Ամենա and root to trigger mono plural allomorphy when root is mono
;

Sets

InfixPunctAdded = ՜ ՞ ՛ ; 
InfixPunctLexical = %{՜%}  %{՞%} %{՛%} ;
Vowel = 	ա  ե է ը ո օ ի  
		Ա  Ե Է Ը Ո Օ Ի  
		;
NonSchwaVowel = ա  ե է ո օ ի  
		Ա  Ե Է  Ո Օ Ի  
		;
Cons = բ գ դ զ թ ժ  լ խ ծ կ հ ձ ղ ճ մ յ ն շ չ պ ջ ռ ս վ տ ր ց ւ փ ք ֆ  
       Բ Գ Դ Զ Թ Ժ  Լ Խ Ծ Կ Հ Ձ Ղ Ճ Մ Յ Ն Շ Չ Պ Ջ Ռ Ս Վ Տ Ր Ց Ւ Փ Ք Ֆ 
       ; 

!Noun-infl boundaries
GeneralNInflBoundary = %{Ninfl%} %{NinflRed%} %{NinflRedForcedNer%} ;

! commenting out because traditional orthography issue
! Summary of contexts ե theme vowel becomes է     in toa
! JeToE = %{ProhPl%} %{Pres3SGE%}  %{Impf%}  %{Pres2PL%}
! ; 

!Summary of contexts ե theme vowel becomes ի     in Hye
JeToI =   %{Pres3SG%}    %{NegPtcpHye%} 
;

! commenting out because hye likely lacks ի theme in modern contexts
! Some  contexts where ի theme vowel becomes է  (ի only in hyw) 
! IToE = %{ImpSg%} %{Impf%} 
! ;


! commenting out because hye likely lacks ի theme in modern contexts
! Some   contexts where ի theme vowel becomes ե  (ի only in hyw)   
! IToJe = %{Aor%}
! ;

! commenting out because this is traditional orthography issue
! Summary of contexts where ա  theme vowel becomes այ
! AtoAJ = %{Pres3SG%}
! ;
 
 Definitions


FullVowel = [ :ա | :ե | :է |  :ո | :օ | :ի | :ո :ւ | 
			 :Ա | :Ե | :Է |  :Ո | :Օ | :Ի | :Ո :Ւ ]
			;

RealVowel = [ FullVowel | :ը | :Ը   ];

RealVowelUR = [ ա: | ե: | է: |  ո: | օ: | ի: | ո: ւ: | ը: |
			Ա: | Ե: | Է: |  Ո: | Օ: | Ի: | Ո: Ւ: | Ը:]  
			;

! For finding monosyllables, I have to specify monosyllabic words with schwa
! because of conflicts with vowel reduction
! Also has to reference underlyng segments because of conflicts with other rules
MonosyllableWithoutSchwa =   (Cons:  ([յ:|ե:]))	RealVowelUR  (Cons:  (Cons:))   (Cons:)   ;
MonosyllableWithSchwa  =   Cons: (Cons:) (Cons:)  ; 
MonosyllableWithYev =  Cons: (յ:)  և: (Cons:)   (ք:) ;
Monosyllable =  .#.  ( [Cons:|Vowel:]* %{super%}:0 )  [ MonosyllableWithoutSchwa | MonosyllableSchwa | MonosyllableWithYev ];
;
 

Rules



!!!! GLIDE EPENTHESIS
!The glide յ is added between the ա theme vowel and imperfective-i
"The glide յ between the ա theme vowel and before imperfect ի: /ա{ThAյ}{Impf}ի/ -> [այի]" 
%{ThAյ%}:յ <=> ա: _   [      %{Impf%}: :ի ]   ; 
 


!!!!! THEME VOWEL CHANGES
! commenting out because assume no ի theme in hye
!In many contexts, the  ի theme vowel becomes է
! These contexts  are part of IToE
! "theme vowel /իIToE/ to [է]"
! ի:է  <=>   _  0:* IToE: ;

! commenting out because assume no such change in hye unless do traditional orthography
!!In many contexts, the  ե theme vowel becomes է in hyw
! These contexts  are part of JeToE
! "theme vowel /ե{JeToE}/ to [է] in hyw"  
! ե:է  <=>   _ 0:* JeToE: ;   

!!In many contexts, the  ե theme vowel becomes ի in in hye
"theme vowel /ե{JeToI}/ to [ի] in hye" 
ե:ի  <=>   _ 0:* JeToI: ;   



! likely no ի theme in hye so commenting out
!In some contexts, the ի theme vowel becomes ե
! These contexts  are part of IToJe
! "theme vowel /իIToJe}/ to [ե]"
! ի:ե  <=>   _  0:* IToJe: ;

! likely no ի theme in hye so commenting out
!When there's a full vowel after the infinitival, the ի theme vowel becomes ե
!Needed finessing in order to apply across zero morphs and consonants liek նի
!"theme vowel /ի{լ}V/ to [ե]"
!ի:ե  <=>   _  %{լ%}:  [ :0 | :Cons ]*  FullVowel ;

! likely no ու theme in hye so commenting out
! When there's a full vowel after the infinitival, the ու theme vowel becomes ե
! "theme vowel /ու/ to [ե]"
! ո:ե  <=>   _ ւ:0 %{լ%}:  [ :0 | :Cons ]*  FullVowel ;
! "theme vowel /ու/ to [ե]"
! ւ:0  <=>   _ %{լ%}:  [ :0 | :Cons ]*  FullVowel ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! Noun allomorphy

! For definite allomorphy, the input definite suffix is %{defն%} 
! It's a   ն after/before vowels, ը elsewhere
! Need the :0* context because of deleted glides
! Need the ու line because of infixal punctuation creating *բո՝ւը
"definite suffix is ն after/before vowels"
%{defն%}:ն <=>   RealVowel  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _ ;
 				:ո  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* :ւ _ ;
				_ (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* RealVowel ;
 				_  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* :ո   (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* :ւ  ;
				
				
! For plural allomorphy, the input plural suffix is %{Plն%}եր
! The rule will drop %{Plն%} after monosyllables, defined roughty as maximally CJVCCk
!The suffix is -er also after monosyllabic-headed compounds
!I assume that the right compounds end in a {mono} diacritic
"plural suffix is եր after monosyllables and after monosyllabic-headed compounds"
%{Plն%}:0 <=> Monosyllable :0*  _ ;
				%{mono%}: :0*  _ ;

! commenting out until do hye conversion
! For plural possessive allomorphy, there is a fake plural suffix եր if after monosyllable
! The rule will turn the relevant diacritics into the plural suffix
!Same for compounds with monosyllabic head
! "spurious plural suffix is եր after monosyllables and mono-head compounds: for ե"
! %{SpurPlե%}:ե <=> Monosyllable  :0*  _ ;
!				%{mono%}:  :0*  _ ;
!"spurious plural suffix is եր after monosyllables and mono-head compounds: for ր"
!%{SpurPlր%}:ր  <=> Monosyllable  :0*  %{SpurPlե%}:ե _ ;
!				%{mono%}:  :0*  %{SpurPlե%}:ե _ ;

! tbd how to model plural possessive in hye
! For plural possessive allomorphy, the suffix loses ի before a vowel
! "Delete the vowel ի of the plural possessive before a vowel է ո ի " 
!%{PossPlի%}:0  <=>  _ [:է | :ո | :ի ];



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!! Destressed reduction
! In nouns, if the last stem vowel is ի or ու, then it is deleted in the orthography if
! It precedes a vowel-initial inflectional suffix
! I capture that by using a morpheme boundary %{NinflRed%} that's only found
! between nouns and inflection for reduction
! Doesn't target word-initial vowels in the orthography
"Delete ի if before a vowel-initial suffix, with 1 or more consonants between them; can be forced before -ner in some lexemes"
ի:0 <=>  _ :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRed%}: (:0)*  FullVowel ; 
		_ :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRedForcedNer%}:  ; 
			except
				.#. (:0)* _ ; 
"Delete ու  if before a vowel-initial suffix, with 1 or more consonants between them (part 1); can be forced before -ner in some lexemes"
ո:0 <=> _ ւ: :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRed%}: (:0)*  FullVowel ;
		_ ւ: :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRedForcedNer%}:  ; 
			except
				.#. (:0)* _ ; 
"Delete ու  if before a vowel-initial suffix, with 1 or more consonants between them (part 2); can be forced before -ner in some lexemes"
ւ:0 <=> ո: _  :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRed%}: (:0)*  FullVowel ;
		ո: _  :Cons :Cons* (:0)* %{NinflRedForcedNer%}:  ; 
			except
				.#. (:0)* ո: _ ; 


!!!!!!!!!
!! glide deletion in nouns
! commenting out because a matter of traditional orthography
! The glide յ is deleted when a) it follows ա or ո, b) it's before nominal suffixes
! and c) the suffix is consonantal-initial
! But not for monosyllabic nouns
! It's deleted before definite suffix
!"Delete glide յ  in the context ա/ո _ C-initial suffix "
!յ:0 <=>  :ա (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*  :Cons ;
!        :ա (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* %{defն%}: ;
!		:ո (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*  :Cons ;
!        :ո (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* _  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* GeneralNInflBoundary:  (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*  %{defն%}: ;
!		except
!   	    	Monosyllable (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)*	_  ;
!   	    	 	_ (:0|:InfixPunctAdded)* %{mono%}: ;

!! glide epenthesis in nouns
! The glide յ is added when a) it follows ա ո օ , b) it's before nominal suffixes
! and c) the suffix is vowel-initial
! It's absent before definite suffix
"Insert glide յ  in the context ա _ V-initial suffix "
0:յ <=>  :ա _ :0* GeneralNInflBoundary: :0* RealVowelUR ;
		:ո _ :0* GeneralNInflBoundary: :0* RealVowelUR ;
		:օ _ :0* GeneralNInflBoundary: :0* RealVowelUR ;
	!	except
   	 !   	Monosyllable :0*	_  ; !not sure if this except clause does anything
   	   ! 	%{mono%}: :0*	_  ; 
   	    	
!        :ա _ :0* GeneralNInflBoundary: :0* %{defն%}: ;
  
  
!! o changes for grapheme <ո> <օ> in nouns
! commenting out because issue of traditional orthography
! The grapheme օ becomes ո a) it's before nominal suffixes
! and b) the suffix is vowel-initial
! Have to add caveat that a glide intervenes on the surface
!"Change symbol օ to ո  context օ _ V-initial suffix "
!օ:ո <=>  _ :0* :յ :0* GeneralNInflBoundary: :0*  RealVowelUR ;
		
			
!    	 
! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
